lang/common/courses/xfst-lexc/4.xfscript
define Vow [a|e|o|u|i|y|æ|ø|å] ;
define Cns [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z] ;
define AuxiliarySigns %> ;


define FinalE e -> 0 || _ %> e ;
define FinalM m -> 0 || m _ .#. ;

define Cleanup %> -> 0 ;


read regex [
    FinalE
.o. FinalM
.o. Cleanup
] ;

save stack 4.xfst.hfst
